Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1137
Compliance with act; affirmative defense.

Compliance with the Nebraska Chemigation Act shall be an affirmative defense to any civil action resulting from a person's use of chemigation.

Laws 1986, LB 284, § 37.